District of Columbia statutes.
34-1439

Rules, duties, and powers of the Commission.

(a)

The Commission may impose an administrative fee on a renewable energy credit transaction, but the amount of the fee may not exceed the Commission’s actual direct cost of processing the transaction.

(b)

On or before May 1 of each year, the Commission shall provide a report to the Council on the status of implementation of this chapter, including the availability of tier one renewable sources, certification of the number of credits generated by the utilities meeting the requirements of § 34-1432, and any other such information as the Council shall consider necessary.

(c)

The Commission shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(d)

The Commission shall establish standards, by order or regulation, to account for customer generation from eligible renewable resources for compliance with § 34-1432.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-340, § 11, 52 DCR 2285
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 2112, 61 DCR 9990

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 substituted “May 1” for “April 1” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2112 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2112 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2112 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional ReviewEmergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).